apertium-rus-orv.orv.dix
    <pardef n="v_ѣсти">
      <e><p><l>сти</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>мь</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>си</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сть</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вѣ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>мъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сте</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дѧтъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>хъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ховѣ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>хомъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сте</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>шѧ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяховѣ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяхомъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дясте</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>жь</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>жь</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дивѣ</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дита</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>димь</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дите</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v_дати">
      <e><p><l>ти</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>мь</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>си</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сть</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вѣ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>мъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сте</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дѧтъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дохъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>де</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>де</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>доховѣ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>доста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>доста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дохомъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>досте</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дошѧ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяховѣ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяхомъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дясте</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>жь</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>жь</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дивѣ</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дита</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>димь</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дите</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="v_вѣдѣти">
      <e><p><l>дѣти</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>мь</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>си</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сть</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>вѣ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ста</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>мъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>сте</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дѧтъ</l><r><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дохъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>де</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>де</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>доховѣ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>доста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>доста</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дохомъ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>досте</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дошѧ</l><r><s n="aor"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяше</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяховѣ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяста</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяхомъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дясте</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дяхъ</l><r><s n="impf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>жь</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>жь</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дивѣ</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дита</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>димь</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>дите</l><r><s n="imper"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ѣсти"><p><l>ѣ</l><r>ѣсти</r></p><par n="v_ѣсти"/></e>
    <e lm="дати"><p><l>да</l><r>дати</r></p><par n="v_дати"/></e>
    <e lm="вѣдѣти"><p><l>вѣ</l><r>вѣдѣти</r></p><par n="v_вѣдѣти"/></e>
    <e lm="вѣдѣти"><p><l>вѣдѣт</l><r>вѣдѣти</r></p><par n="v_вѣдѣти"/></e>
    <e lm="дати"><p><l>дат</l><r>дати</r></p><par n="v_дати"/></e>
    <e lm="ѣсти"><p><l>ѣст</l><r>ѣсти</r></p><par n="v_ѣсти"/></e>
